North Carolina, session 2025, HB468.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Statutes are amended by adding a new Chapter to read:
"Chapter 18E.
"Regulation of Kratom Products.
"Article 1.
"Regulation of Kratom Products.
"§ 18E-100. Definitions.
Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) ALE Division. – The Alcohol Law Enforcement Division of the Department
of Public Safety.
(2) Batch. – The kratom product produced during a period of time under similar
conditions and identified by a specific code that allows traceability.
(3) Distributor. – A person or entity that delivers or sells kratom products for the
purpose of distribution in commerce.
(4) Independent testing laboratory. – A laboratory that meets all of the following
conditions:
a. Holds an ISO 17025 accreditation or is registered with the Drug
Enforcement Administration (DEA) in accordance with 21 C.F.R. §
1301.13.
b. Does not have a direct or indirect interest in the entity whose product
is being tested.
c. Does not have a direct or indirect interest in a facility that cultivates,
processes, distributes, dispenses, or sells kratom products in this State
or any other jurisdiction.
d. Has entered into a compliance agreement with the ALE Division to
conduct kratom product testing.
(5) Ingestion. – The process of consuming kratom through the mouth, by
swallowing into the gastrointestinal system or through tissue absorption.
*H468-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Inhalation. – The process of consuming kratom into the respiratory system
through the mouth or nasal passages.
(7) Kratom product. – Any consumer commodity containing any quantity of
mitragynine or 7-hydroxymytragynine or both, extracted from the leaf of the
plant Mitragyna speciosa. This definition includes a synthesized kratom
product.
(8) License. – A license issued in accordance with this Chapter.
(9) Licensee. – A person who has been issued a license in accordance with this
Chapter.
(10) Manufacture. – To compound, blend, extract, infuse, cook, or otherwise
manipulate kratom to make, prepare, or package kratom products.
(11) Manufacturer. – Any person or entity that engages in the process of
manufacturing, preparing, or packaging of kratom products.
(12) Producer. – Any person or entity that engages in the process of farming and
harvesting kratom that is intended to be used in the manufacture of a kratom
product.
(13) Retail dealer. – Any person who sells a kratom product to the ultimate
consumer of the product, including a remote seller.
(14) Serving. – A quantity of a kratom product reasonably suitable for a person's
use in a single day.
(15) Synthesized kratom product. – An alkaloid, metabolite, or alkaloid derivative
that has been created by chemical synthesis or biosynthetic means, including,
but not limited to, fermentation, recombinant techniques, yeast derived,
enzymatic techniques, rather than traditional food preparation techniques,
such as heating or extracting, that synthetically alters the composition of any
kratom alkaloid or constituent.
"§ 18E-101. Sales restrictions on kratom products.
(a) Restriction. – No person shall do any of the following:
(1) Knowingly, or having reason to know, sell a kratom product to a person who
is under 21 years of age. Any retail dealer of kratom products shall demand
proof of age from a prospective purchaser of kratom products before the
kratom products are released to the purchaser if the retail dealer has reasonable
grounds to believe that the prospective purchaser is under 30 years of age.
Any retail dealer that sells a kratom product on an internet website shall verify
the age of any prospective purchaser or shall use a method of delivery that
requires the signature of a person at least 21 years of age before the kratom
product is released.
(2) Knowingly, or having reason to know, distribute samples of kratom products
in or on a public street, sidewalk, park, or public building.
(3) Engage in the business of selling a kratom product without a valid license
issued in accordance with this Chapter.
(4) Knowingly, or having reason to know, sell at retail a kratom product that
violates the provisions of G.S. 18E-104.
(5) Knowingly, or having reason to know, sell at retail or on an internet website
offering delivery in this State, a kratom product that is not in compliance with
G.S. 18E-105.
(b) Civil Penalties. – For any violation of this section, the ALE Division may take any of
the following actions against a retail dealer:
(1) For the first violation, the ALE Division may impose a civil penalty of no
more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).
Page 2 House Bill 468-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) For the second violation within three years, the ALE Division may impose a
civil penalty of no more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).
(3) For the third violation within three years of the first violation, the ALE
Division shall impose a civil penalty of no more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) and suspend the retail dealer's license for one year.
(4) For a fourth or subsequent violation within three years of the first violation,
the ALE Division shall impose a civil penalty of no more than two thousand
dollars ($2,000) and revoke the retail dealer's license.
(c) Compromise. – In any case in which the ALE Division is entitled to suspend or revoke
a retail dealer's license, the ALE Division may accept from the retail dealer an offer in
compromise to pay a penalty of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000). The ALE Division
may either accept a compromise or revoke a license, but not both. The ALE Division may accept
a compromise and suspend the license in the same case.
(d) Testing Fee. – In any case in which the ALE Division imposes a penalty pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, for a violation of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section,
the retail dealer shall also pay to the ALE Division the actual costs paid by the ALE Division for
testing of the samples resulting in the violation. Any fee collected pursuant to this subsection
shall be remitted to the ALE Division.
(e) Defenses. – It is a defense to a violation of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this
section if the retail dealer does any of the following:
(1) Shows that the purchaser produced a drivers license, a special identification
card issued under G.S. 20-37.7 or issued by the state agency of any other state
authorized to issue similar official state special identification cards for that
state, a tribal enrollment card issued by a State or federally recognized Indian
Tribe, a military identification card, or a passport showing the purchaser's age
to be at least the required age for purchase and bearing a physical description
of the person named on the card reasonably describing the purchaser.
(2) Produces evidence of other facts that reasonably indicated at the time of sale
that the purchaser was at least the required age.
(3) Shows that at the time of purchase, the purchaser utilized a biometric
identification system that demonstrated (i) the purchaser's age to be at least
the required age for the purchase and (ii) the purchaser had previously
registered with the retail dealer or retail dealer's agent a drivers license, a
special identification card issued under G.S. 20-37.7 or issued by the state
agency of any other state authorized to issue similar official state special
identification cards for that state, a military identification card, or a passport
showing the purchaser's date of birth and bearing a physical description of the
person named on the document.
(f) Proceeds of Civil Penalty. – The clear proceeds of any civil penalty imposed under
this section, including any penalty received as an offer in compromise, shall be remitted to the
Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
(g) Forfeiture. – Any product sold in violation of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this
section shall be subject to forfeiture pursuant to the procedures set forth in G.S. 18E-401.
(h) Criminal Penalty. – Any person against whom a civil penalty has been imposed for
violation of subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section who commits a second violation of
subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a Class A1 misdemeanor. Any person
who commits a third or subsequent violation of subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section
is guilty of a Class H felony.
"§ 18E-101A. Sales and transfer restrictions on a producer.
House Bill 468-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Restriction. – A producer shall not knowingly sell or in any way transfer kratom that
has been processed or prepared with the intent to be used in a kratom product to any person or
entity other than a manufacturer licensed pursuant to this Chapter.
(b) Civil Penalties. – Violation of this section shall have the following penalties:
(1) For the first violation, the ALE Division may impose a civil penalty of no
more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).
(2) For the second violation within three years, the ALE Division may impose a
civil penalty of no more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).
(3) For the third violation within three years of the first violation, the ALE
Division shall impose a civil penalty of no more than one thousand dollars
($1,000).
(4) For a fourth or subsequent violation within three years of the first violation,
the ALE Division shall impose a civil penalty of no more than two thousand
dollars ($2,000).
(c) Proceeds of Civil Penalty. – The clear proceeds of any civil penalty imposed under
this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with
G.S. 115C-457.2.
(d) Criminal Penalty. – Any person against whom a civil penalty has been imposed for
violation of this section who commits a second violation of this section is guilty of a Class A1
misdemeanor. Any person who commits a third or subsequent violation of this section is guilty
of a Class H felony.
(e) Applicability of this Section. – Nothing in this section shall be construed as
prohibiting a producer from selling or transferring kratom that is intended to be used in any lawful
product other than those regulated by this Chapter.
"§ 18E-102. Offenses involving the purchase, attempted purchase, or possession of kratom
products by a person under 21 years of age.
(a) It is unlawful for any person to give a kratom product to anyone less than 21 years
old without the consent of the underaged person's parent or legal guardian.
(b) It is unlawful for a person less than 21 years old to purchase or attempt to purchase a
kratom product.
(c) It is unlawful for any person to enter or attempt to enter a place where kratom products
are sold or consumed, or to obtain or attempt to obtain kratom products, or to obtain or attempt
to obtain permission to purchase kratom products, in violation of subsection (b) of this section,
by using or attempting to use any of the following:
(1) A fraudulent or altered drivers license.
(2) A fraudulent or altered identification document other than a drivers license.
(3) A drivers license issued to another person.
(4) An identification document other than a drivers license issued to another
person.
(5) Any other form or means of identification that indicates or symbolizes that the
person is not prohibited from purchasing or possessing a kratom product under
this section.
(d) It is unlawful for any person to permit the use of the person's drivers license or any
other form of identification of any kind issued or given to the person by any other person who
violates or attempts to violate subsection (b) of this section.
(e) Penalties. –
(1) Any person less than 21 years old who violates this section is guilty of a Class
2 misdemeanor.
(2) Any person at least 21 years old who violates this section is guilty of a Class
1 misdemeanor.
Page 4 House Bill 468-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Aiding or abetting a violation of this section shall be punished as provided in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, and all other provisions of this
section shall apply to that offense.
(f) Nothing in this section prohibits an underage person from selling, transporting, or
possessing kratom products in the course of employment, if the employment of the person for
that purpose is lawful under applicable youth employment statutes.
"§ 18E-103. Offenses involving the manufacture and distribution of kratom products.
(a) Offenses. – It is unlawful for a manufacturer or distributor to do any of the following:
(1) Knowingly, or having reason to know, distribute samples of a kratom product
in or on a public street, sidewalk, park, or public building.
(2) Engage in the business of manufacturing or distributing a kratom product
without a valid license issued in accordance with this Chapter.
(3) Knowingly, or having reason to know, manufacture or distribute a kratom
product that violates the provisions of G.S. 18E-104.
(b) Criminal Penalties. – A violation of this section is a Class A1 misdemeanor.
(c) Civil Penalties. – In addition to any criminal punishment authorized by this section,
for any violation of this section the ALE Division shall take one or more of the following actions
against the licensee:
(1) Suspend the licensee's license for a specified period of time not longer than
three years.
(2) Revoke the licensee's license.
(3) Impose conditions on the operating hours of the licensee's business.
(4) Impose civil penalties as follows:
a. For a first violation, impose a civil penalty of no more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
b. For a second violation within three years, impose a civil penalty of no
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).
c. For a third violation within three years of the first violation, impose a
civil penalty of no more than seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500).
(d) Compromise. – In any case in which the ALE Division is entitled to suspend or revoke
a manufacturer's or distributor's license, the ALE Division may accept from the manufacturer or
distributor an offer in compromise to pay a penalty of not more than eight thousand dollars
($8,000). The ALE Division may either accept a compromise or revoke a license, but not both.
The ALE Division may accept a compromise and suspend the license in the same case.
(e) Testing Fee. – In any case in which the ALE Division imposes a penalty pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section, for a violation of subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section,
the manufacturer or distributor shall also pay to the ALE Division the actual costs paid by the
ALE Division for testing of the samples resulting in the violation. Any fee collected pursuant to
this subsection shall be remitted to the ALE Division.
(f) Proceeds of Civil Penalty. – The clear proceeds of any civil penalty imposed under
this section, including any penalty received as an offer in compromise, shall be remitted to the
Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
(g) Forfeiture. – Any product sold in violation of subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this
section shall be subject to forfeiture pursuant to the procedures set forth in G.S. 18E-301.
"§ 18E-104. Testing prior to distribution.
(a) Requirement. – The manufacturer shall have a kratom product tested prior to
distribution to a distributor or before distributing the product to a retail dealer. If the kratom
product is packaged in a manner that may be sold to the ultimate consumer of the product when
delivered to the distributor and the distributor does not open such package, the distributor is not
required to test the kratom product. If the kratom product is not packaged in a manner that may
House Bill 468-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
be sold to the ultimate consumer of the product when delivered to the distributor or the distributor
does open such package, the distributor shall have the kratom product tested prior to distribution.
The testing shall determine the presence and amounts of any of the substances listed in subsection
(b) of this section. No product that contains more than the maximum amount indicated for any
substance in subsection (b) of this section shall be distributed or sold in this State.
(b) Substances Tested; Limitations. – A kratom manufacturer, distributor, or retail dealer
shall not prepare, manufacture, distribute, or offer for sale any of the following:
(1) A kratom product that is adulterated with a dangerous non-kratom substance.
A kratom product is adulterated with a dangerous non-kratom substance if the
kratom product is mixed or packed with a non-kratom substance and that
substance affects the quality or strength of the kratom product to such a degree
as to potentially render the kratom product injurious to a consumer.
(2) A kratom product that is contaminated with a dangerous non-kratom
substance. A kratom product is contaminated with a dangerous non-kratom
substance if the kratom product contains a poisonous or otherwise deleterious
non-kratom ingredient, including any controlled substance regulated by
Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(3) A kratom extract that contains levels of residual solvents higher than is
allowed in the U.S. Pharmacopeia 467.
(4) A kratom product containing a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid
fraction that is greater than two percent (2%) or 0.4 mg on a dry matter basis
of the overall alkaloid composition of the product.
(5) A kratom product containing any synthetic alkaloids, including synthetic
mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine, or any other synthetically
derived compounds of the kratom plant.
(6) A kratom product that does not provide adequate labeling directions necessary
for safe use by consumers, including a recommended serving size, the
recommended number of servings per day, and the number of servings in the
package that is sold.
(7) A kratom product in any form that is combustible, intended to be used for
vaporization, or injectable.
(8) A synthesized kratom product that is marketed or sold as "kratom."
(c) Laboratory Qualifications. – A manufacturer or distributor shall contract with an
independent testing laboratory to provide the testing required under subsection (a) of this section.
(d) Testing Method. – A laboratory providing testing required under subsection (a) of this
section shall use high-performance liquid chromatography for any separation and measurement
required in the testing.
(e) Batch Testing. – A sample of each batch manufactured shall undergo the testing
required by subsection (a) of this section and shall obtain a certificate of analysis by an
independent testing laboratory. The size of sample required to be tested shall be determined by
the size of the batch as follows:
(1) For a batch containing 1 to 999 units, the required sample size is 1 unit.
(2) For a batch containing 1,000 to 4,999 units, the required sample size is 2 units.
(3) For a batch containing 5,000 to 9,999 units, the required sample size is 3 units.
(4) For a batch containing 10,000 or more units, the required sample size is 5
units.
(f) Expiration Date. – A kratom product shall have an expiration date on the label that
conforms with applicable federal law.
(g) Civil Penalties. – A violation of this section shall result in the ALE Division taking
one or more of the following actions against the licensee:
Page 6 House Bill 468-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Suspend the licensee's license for a specified period of time not longer than
three years.
(2) Revoke the licensee's license.
(3) Impose conditions on the operating hours of the licensee's business.
(4) Impose civil penalties as follows:
a. For a first violation, impose a civil penalty of no more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
b. For a second violation within three years, impose a civil penalty of no
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).
c. For a third violation within three years of the first violation, impose a
civil penalty of no more than seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500).
(h) Compromise. – In any case in which the ALE Division is entitled to suspend or revoke
a manufacturer's or distributor's license, the ALE Division may accept from the manufacturer or
distributor an offer in compromise to pay a penalty of not more than eight thousand dollars
($8,000). The ALE Division may either accept a compromise or revoke a license, but not both.
The ALE Division may accept a compromise and suspend the license in the same case.
(i) Proceeds of Civil Penalty. – The clear proceeds of any civil penalty imposed under
this section, including any penalty received as an offer in compromise, shall be remitted to the
Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
(j) ALE Division Duties. – The ALE Division shall do all of the following:
(1) Maintain and post on its website a list of testing laboratories that meet the
independent testing laboratory standard to test intermediate manufactured
material and finished kratom products.
(2) Develop an application and process to determine qualifying laboratories to be
listed on the ALE Division's website. The application shall require a
potentially qualifying laboratory to submit a sample certificate of analysis
issued by the applying laboratory indicating that the laboratory is capable of
detecting the chemicals provided in subsection (b) of this section.
"§ 18E-105. Additional requirements for manufacturers and distributors.
(a) Registration of Products. – All manufacturers and distributors shall register with the
ALE Division all kratom products offered for sale in this State by the manufacturer or distributor.
The registration shall include any information that the ALE Division deems necessary to ensure
compliance with the provisions of this Chapter.
(b) Adverse Event Reports. – A manufacturer or distributor, upon receipt of any adverse
event report related to a product manufactured or distributed by that manufacturer or distributor,
shall submit a copy of the adverse event report, as required under 21 U.S.C. § 379aa-1, to the
ALE Division within 30 days. If the manufacturer or distributor does not submit a copy of the
adverse event report within the time allotted, the registration for that product shall be revoked
and the license for that manufacturer or distributor shall be suspended or revoked, at the
discretion of the ALE Division.
(c) Packaging Requirements. – A kratom product that is sold in this State shall be labeled
with consumer protection warnings in the form of statements that cover all of the following:
(1) A list of ingredients and possible allergens and a nutritional fact panel or a
quick response code that can be scanned that directs consumers to a website
containing the list of ingredients and possible allergens and a nutritional fact
panel.
(2) A statement that the product is not approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration.
(3) A statement to keep out of reach of children.
(4) A statement to consult your health professional before use.
House Bill 468-Third Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The net weight of the product.
(6) An expiration date in accordance with applicable federal law.
(7) A listing of quantitative declarations of the amount of mitrogynine and
7-hydroxymitrogynine per serving and other ingredients in the product.
(8) The recommended serving size.
(d) Advertising Restrictions. – A manufacturer, distributor, or retail dealer of a kratom
product shall not advertise, market, or offer for sale the product by using, in the labeling or design
of the product or product packaging or in advertising or marketing materials for the product trade
dress, trademarks, branding, or other related materials, any imagery or scenery that depicts or
signifies characters or symbols known to appeal primarily to persons under 21 years of age,
including, but not limited to, superheroes, comic book characters, video game characters,
television show characters, movie characters, mythical creatures, unicorns, animals, cartoon
characters, or any imitation of the packaging or labeling of candy, cereals, sweets, chips, or other
food products typically marketed to persons under 21 years of age.
"§ 18E-105.1. Conduct on licensed premises.
(a) Certain Conduct. – It shall be unlawful for a licensee or the licensee's agent or
employee to knowingly allow any of the following kinds of conduct to occur on the licensed
premises:
(1) Any violation of this Chapter.
(2) Any violation of the controlled substances, gambling, or any other unlawful
acts.
(b) Supervision. – It shall be unlawful for a licensee to fail to superintend in person or
through a manager the business for which a license is issued.
"§ 18E-105.2. Safe harbor protection for goods not sold in State.
(a) This Chapter shall not apply to the following:
(1) A safe harbor kratom product.
(2) A safe harbor manufacturer or storage facility.
(b) For the purposes of this section, a "Safe Harbor Kratom Product" means kratom,
whether a finished product or in the process of being produced, that is permitted to be
manufactured for distribution, produced for distribution, packaged for distribution, processed for
distribution, prepared for distribution, treated for distribution, transported for distribution, or held
for distribution in North Carolina for export from North Carolina but that is not permitted to be
sold or distributed in North Carolina.
(c) For the purposes of this section, a "Safe Harbor Manufacturer or Storage Facility"
means a facility that manufactures for distribution, produces for distribution, packages for
distribution, processes for distribution, prepares for distribution, treats for distribution, transports
for distribution, or holds for distribution a Safe Harbor Kratom Product.
"§ 18E-106. Construction of Chapter.
Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to do any of the following:
(1) Permit a person to undertake any task under the influence of a kratom product
when doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice.
(2) Permit a person to operate, navigate, or be in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle, aircraft, motorized watercraft, or any other vehicle while under the
influence of a kratom product.
(3) Require an employer to accommodate the use of a kratom product in a
workplace or an employee working while under the influence of a kratom
product.
(4) Require an individual or establishment in lawful possession of property to
admit a guest, client, customer, or other visitor who is impaired as a result of
the person's use of a kratom product.
Page 8 House Bill 468-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Exempt a person from prosecution for a criminal offense related to impairment
or intoxication resulting from the use of a kratom product or relieve a person
from any requirement under law to submit to a breath, blood, urine, or other
test to detect the presence of a controlled substance.
(6) Limit the ability of an employer to establish, continue, or enforce a drug-free
workplace program or policy.
(7) Create a cause of action against an employer for wrongful discharge or
discrimination.
(8) Allow the possession, sale, manufacture, or distribution of any substance that
is otherwise prohibited by Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
"Article 2.
"Licensing.
"§ 18E-200. Definitions.
The definitions contained in Article 1 of this Chapter apply to this Article as appropriate.
"§ 18E-201. Licensing requirements; qualifications; duration.
(a) Requirement. – Prior to the commencement of business or by July 1, 2026, whichever
is later, a person or entity engaged in this State in any business regulated by this Chapter and
listed in this subsection shall obtain a license to engage in that business from the ALE Division.
Businesses engaging in one or more of the following are required to obtain a license pursuant to
this section:
(1) Manufacturing kratom products.
(2) Distributing kratom products.
(3) Selling kratom products.
(b) Qualifications. – In order to obtain and maintain a license under subsection (a) of this
section, a person shall meet all of the following criteria:
(1) Be at least 21 years old.
(2) Submit to the ALE Division any information determined by the ALE Division
to be necessary for the efficient enforcement of this Chapter.
(3) Have not been convicted of a felony relating to a controlled substance within
10 years in any state or federal jurisdiction.
(4) Consent to reasonable inspection by the ALE Division of the inventory of
products regulated by this Chapter to ensure compliance with this Chapter and
the taking of samples found to not be in compliance with the packaging,
labeling, and testing requirements of this section.
(5) Be current in filing all applicable tax returns to the State and in payment of all
taxes, interest, and penalties collectable pursuant to G.S. 105-241.22.
(c) Single License Required. – A person or entity engaged in more than one of the
businesses listed in subsection (a) of this section shall only be required to obtain a single license.
Upon application for a license, the person or entity engaged in more than one type of business
regulated by this Chapter must indicate on the license application all of the businesses listed in
subsection (a) of this section in which the business engages or intends to engage. A person or
entity applying for a license for more than one type of business listed in subsection (a) of this
section shall pay a single fee as provided in G.S. 18E-202(c).
(d) Duration. – A license issued pursuant to this Article is valid for a period of one year
and shall be renewed annually.
"§ 18E-202. Fees.
(a) Application Fee. – The application fee for a license required pursuant to this Article
shall be as follows:
(1) For a license to manufacture kratom products, a fee of fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000). However, if an applicant submits proof that the applicant's gross
House Bill 468-Third Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
income for the calendar year prior to application was less than one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000), the fee shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) For a license to distribute kratom products, a fee of two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500). However, if an applicant submits proof that the applicant's
gross income for the calendar year prior to application was less than one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the fee shall be seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00).
(3) For a license to sell kratom products at a retail location, or online for delivery
to a person within this State, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for
each location or each internet website offering delivery in this State. However,
a single entity with more than 25 locations, internet websites offering delivery
in this State, or a combination of the two shall not pay more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000) and shall submit a list of all locations and all internet websites
offering delivery in this State to the ALE Division.
(b) Renewal Fee. – The renewal fee for a license issued pursuant to this Article shall be
as follows:
(1) For a license to manufacture kratom products, a renewal fee of five thousand
dollars ($5,000).
(2) For a license to distribute kratom products, a renewal fee of seven hundred
fifty dollars ($750.00).
(3) For a license to sell kratom products at a retail location or online for delivery
to a person within this State, a renewal fee in the same amount as the initial
licensing fees established under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) For an application for or renewal of a license to engage in more than one business
listed in subsection (a) of G.S. 18E-201, the fee shall be the highest fee of those prescribed for
the types of business indicated on the application or renewal, as applied to that applicant or
licensee.
"§ 18E-203. ALE Division authority to deny or revoke.
The ALE Division may revoke or refuse to issue any license for any of the following:
(1) Failure to comply with or meet any of the qualifications required by
G.S. 18E-201(b).
(2) Submission of false or misleading information in an application for licensure
or renewal.
(3) Submission of false or misleading information in any report or information
required by this Chapter to be submitted to the ALE Division.
(4) Failure to comply with civil penalties authorized by this Chapter.
"§ 18E-204. Civil penalties; procedure.
Proceedings for the assessment of civil penalties authorized in Article 1 of this Chapter shall
be governed by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If the person or entity assessed a civil
penalty fails to pay the penalty to the ALE Division, the ALE Division may institute an action in
the superior court of the county in which the person resides or has their principal place of business
to recover the unpaid amount of the penalty. An action to recover a civil penalty under this
Chapter shall not relieve any party from any other penalty prescribed by law.
"§ 18E-205. ALE Division to develop application, adopt rules, remit revenue.
(a) License Application. – The ALE Division shall develop and make available online an
application for the license required by this Article.
(b) Rules. – The ALE Division shall have authority to adopt, amend, and repeal rules to
carry out the provisions of this Chapter.
(c) Distribution of Revenue. – The revenue collected from fees established under this
Chapter shall be remitted to the ALE Division, on a monthly basis, to be used to cover costs
incurred by the ALE Division in enforcing the provisions of this Chapter. To the extent the funds
Page 10 House Bill 468-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
described in this subsection are deemed unappropriated, the funds are hereby appropriated for
the purpose set forth in this subsection.
"Article 3.
"Enforcement.
"§ 18E-300. ALE Division.
(a) Authority. – The ALE Division shall enforce the provisions of this Chapter in a
manner that is reasonable to reduce the extent to which kratom products are sold or distributed
to persons under 21 years of age and shall conduct random, unannounced inspections at locations
where kratom products are sold or distributed to ensure compliance with the provisions of this
Chapter. If, upon reasonable inspection, the ALE Division determines a licensee's inventory may
consist of products not in compliance with the packaging, labeling, and testing requirements of
this Chapter, the ALE Division is authorized to only take samples of a licensee's inventory of
kratom products considered noncompliant to be submitted for testing in order to determine
compliance with the provisions of this Chapter. To procure evidence of violations of this Chapter,
ALE Division agents shall have authority to investigate the operation of each licensee under this
Chapter and each licensed premises for which a license has been issued under this Chapter, to
make inspections that include viewing the entire premises, including the examination of records,
equipment, and proceeds related to the manufacture or distribution of kratom products. The
inspection authorized by this section may be made at any time it reasonably appears that someone
is on the premises.
(b) Interference with Inspection. – Refusal by a licensee or by any employee of a licensee
to permit ALE Division agents to enter the premises to make an inspection authorized by
subsection (a) of this section shall be cause for suspension, revocation, or other action against the
licensee. It shall be a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to resist or obstruct an agent attempting
to make a lawful inspection under this section.
(c) Report. – Beginning January 1, 2027, the ALE Division shall submit an annual report
to the General Assembly describing in detail the ALE Division's enforcement efforts under this
Chapter. The ALE Division shall also make the report required under this subsection available
on the ALE Division's website.
"§ 18E-301. Forfeiture of property.
(a) Seizure of Product. – For any kratom product subject to forfeiture, a law enforcement
officer is hereby authorized and empowered to seize and take possession of such products.
(b) Custody until Trial. – A law enforcement officer seizing a product subject to forfeiture
shall provide for its safe storage until trial.
(c) Disposition after Criminal Trial. – The presiding judge in a criminal proceeding for
violation of G.S. 18E-103(a)(3) may take the following actions after resolution of a charge
against the owner or possessor of products subject to forfeiture under this section:
(1) If the owner or possessor of the product is found guilty of a violation of
G.S. 18E-103(a)(3), the judge shall order the product forfeited.
(2) If the owner or possessor of the product is found not guilty, or if the charge is
dismissed or otherwise resolved in favor of the owner or possessor, the judge
shall order the product returned to the owner or possessor.
(3) If the product is also needed as evidence at an administrative hearing, the
judge shall provide that the order does not go into effect until the ALE
Division determines that the product is no longer needed for the administrative
proceeding.
(d) Disposition after Civil Forfeiture Proceeding. – Violations of G.S. 18E-101(a)(4)
shall be subject to forfeiture under the procedure set forth in G.S. 75D-5.
(e) Disposition of Forfeited Product. – Notwithstanding G.S. 75D-5(j), a judge ordering
forfeiture of property shall order the product destroyed.
House Bill 468-Third Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f) Return of Property. – Any owner of products seized for forfeiture may apply to a
judge to have the products returned to the owner if no criminal charge has been made or no action
for civil forfeiture has been commenced in connection with that product within a reasonable time
after seizure. The judge may not order the return of the product if possession by the owner would
be unlawful."
SECTION 2. G.S. 18B-500(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Subject Matter Jurisdiction. – After taking the oath prescribed for a peace officer, an
alcohol law-enforcement agent shall have authority to arrest and take other investigatory and
enforcement actions for any criminal offense:
(1) Occurring, encountered, or otherwise discovered on the premises of, or
elsewhere when the conduct relates to, a location under application for or
holding a permit issued by the North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control
Commission or the North Carolina Education Lottery Commission.
(1b) Occurring, encountered, or otherwise discovered on the premises of, or
elsewhere when the conduct relates to, a location holding a license issued
pursuant to Chapter 18E of the General Statutes.
(2) Encountered or otherwise discovered while investigating or enforcing matters
for the North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission or the North
Carolina Education Lottery Commission or encountered or otherwise
discovered while investigating or enforcing the provisions of this Chapter,
Chapter 18C of the General Statutes, Chapter 18E of the General Statutes,
G.S. 14-313, or Parts 1 and 2 of Article 37 of Chapter 14 of the General
Statutes.
(3) Encountered or otherwise discovered while carrying out any duty or function
assigned to the Division by law.
(4) Occurring in an agent's presence.
(5) When assisting another law enforcement agency."
SECTION 3. G.S. 7A-304(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) In every criminal case in the superior or district court, wherein the defendant is
convicted, or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or when costs are assessed against the
prosecuting witness, the following costs shall be assessed and collected. No costs may be
assessed when a case is dismissed. Only upon entry of a written order, supported by findings of
fact and conclusions of law, determining that there is just cause, the court may (i) waive costs
assessed under this section or (ii) waive or reduce costs assessed under subdivision (7), (8), (8a),
(11), (12), or (13) of this section. No court may waive or remit all or part of any court fines or
costs without providing notice and opportunity to be heard by all government entities directly
affected. The court shall provide notice to the government entities directly affected of (i) the date
and time of the hearing and (ii) the right to be heard and make an objection to the remission or
waiver of all or part of the order of court costs at least 15 days prior to hearing. Notice shall be
made to the government entities affected by first-class mail to the address provided for receipt of
court costs paid pursuant to the order. The costs referenced in this subsection are listed below:
…
(15) For the services of any laboratory facility, the district or superior court judge
shall, upon conviction, order payment of the sum of six hundred dollars
($600.00) to be remitted to the Alcohol Law Enforcement Division of the
Department of Public Safety (ALE Division) or agency that paid for the
laboratory services. The cost shall be assessed only in cases in which (i) the
defendant is convicted of a violation of G.S. 18E-103(a)(3) and (ii) as part of
the investigation leading to the defendant's conviction, testing was conducted
at a laboratory on products regulated under Chapter 18E of the General
Statutes."
Page 12 House Bill 468-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.(a) Article 29A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes reads as
rewritten:
"Article 29A.
"Policy Prohibiting Use Of Tobacco Products, Kratom Products, and Hemp-Derived
Consumable Products.
"§ 115C-407. Policy prohibiting tobacco product, kratom product, and hemp-derived
consumable product use in school buildings, grounds, and at school-sponsored
events.
(a) Not later than August 1, 2008, local boards of education Governing bodies of public
school units shall adopt, implement, and enforce adopt a written policy prohibiting at all times
the use of any tobacco product, kratom product, or hemp-derived consumable product by any
person in school buildings, in school facilities, on school campuses, and in or on any other school
property owned or operated by the local school administrative public school unit. The policy
shall further prohibit the use of all tobacco products, kratom products, and hemp-derived
consumable products by persons attending a school-sponsored event at a location not listed in
this subsection when in the presence of students or school personnel or in an area where smoking
is otherwise prohibited by law.
(b) The policy shall include at least all of the following elements:
(1) Adequate notice to students, parents, the public, and school personnel of the
policy.
(2) Posting of signs prohibiting at all times the use of tobacco products, kratom
products, and hemp-derived consumable products by any person in and on
school property.
(3) Requirements that school personnel enforce the policy.
(c) The policy may permit tobacco products products, kratom products, and
hemp-derived consumable products to be included in instructional or research activities in public
school buildings if the activity is conducted or supervised by the faculty member overseeing the
instruction or research and the activity does not include smoking, chewing, or otherwise ingesting
the tobacco product.product, kratom product, or hemp-derived consumable product.
(d) The North Carolina Health and Wellness Trust Fund Commission Tobacco
Prevention and Control Branch shall work with local boards of education governing bodies of
public school units to provide assistance with the implementation of this policy including
providing information regarding smoking cessation and prevention resources. Nothing in this
section, G.S. 143-595 through G.S. 143-601, or any other section prohibits a local board of
education governing body of a public school unit from adopting and enforcing a more restrictive
policy on the use of tobacco products, kratom products, or hemp-derived consumable products
in school buildings, in school facilities, on school campuses, or at school-related or
school-sponsored events, and in or on other school property.
(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Hemp-derived consumable product. – As defined in G.S. 14-313.1.
(2) Kratom product. – As defined in G.S. 18E-100
(3) Tobacco product. – As defined in G.S. 14-313, including vapor products.
(4) Vapor product. – As defined in G.S. 14-313."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(15a) The board of trustees shall adopt a policy prohibiting tobacco products,
kratom products, and hemp-derived consumable products in accordance with
Article 29A of this Chapter."
SECTION 4.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) Policy Prohibiting Tobacco Product, Kratom Product, and Hemp-Derived
Consumable Product. – A charter school shall adopt a policy prohibiting tobacco products,
House Bill 468-Third Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
kratom products, or hemp-derived consumable products in accordance with Article 29A of this
Chapter."
SECTION 4.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) Policy prohibiting tobacco product, kratom product, and hemp-derived
consumable product. – A regional school shall adopt a policy prohibiting
tobacco products, kratom products, and hemp-derived consumable products
in accordance with Article 29A of this Chapter."
SECTION 4.(e) G.S. 116-235 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(k) Prohibition of Tobacco Product, Kratom Product, and Hemp-Derived Consumable
Product. – The Board of Trustees shall adopt a policy prohibiting tobacco products, kratom
products, and hemp-derived consumable products in accordance with Article 29A of Chapter
115C of the General Statutes."
SECTION 4.(f) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) Prohibition of tobacco product, kratom product, and hemp-derived
consumable product. – The laboratory school shall adopt a policy prohibiting
tobacco products, kratom products, and hemp-derived consumable products
in accordance with Article 29A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes."
SECTION 4.(g) G.S. 115C-562.5(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(7a) For any school facility in which students attend in-person classes, the school
shall adopt a policy that is consistent with the requirements of Article 29A of
this Chapter to prohibit the use of tobacco products, kratom products, or
hemp-derived consumable products on school grounds."
SECTION 5. Article 39 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-313.1. Possession of hemp-derived consumable products under age 21 prohibited.
(a) Definitions. – Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply
in this section:
(1) Hemp. – As defined in G.S. 90-87.
(2) Hemp-derived cannabinoid. – Any phytocannabinoid found in hemp,
including delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9 THC), tetrahydrocannabinolic
acid (THCA), cannabidiol (CBD), cannabidiolic acid (CBDA), cannabinol
(CBN), cannabigerol (CBG), cannabichromene (CBC), cannabicyclol (CBL),
cannabivarin (CBV), tetrahydrocannabivarin (THCV), cannabidivarin
(CBDV), cannabicitran (CBT), delta-7 tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-7 THC),
delta-8 tetrahydrocannibinol (delta-8 THC), or delta-10 tetrahydrocannibinol
(delta-10 THC). This term also includes any synthetic cannabinoid derived
from hemp and contained in a hemp-derived consumable product.
(3) Hemp-derived consumable product. – A hemp product that is a finished good
intended for human ingestion or inhalation that contains a delta-9 THC
concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry
weight basis, but may contain concentrations of other hemp-derived
cannabinoids, in excess of that amount. This term does not include hemp
products intended for topical application, or seeds or seed-derived ingredients
that are generally recognized as safe by the United States Food and Drug
Administration (FDA).
(4) Hemp product. – As defined in G.S. 90-87.
(5) Ingestion. – The process of consuming through the mouth, by swallowing into
the gastrointestinal system or through tissue absorption.
(6) Inhalation. – The process of consuming into the respiratory system through
the mouth or nasal passages.
Page 14 House Bill 468-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Prohibition. – Both of the following are unlawful:
(1) For any person to knowingly sell or give a hemp-derived consumable product
to a person who is under 21 years of age. A person engaged in the sale of
hemp-derived consumable products shall demand proof of age from a
prospective purchaser if the person has reasonable grounds to believe that the
prospective purchaser is under 21 years of age.
(2) For any person who is under 21 years of age to possess a hemp-derived
consumable product.
(c) Punishment. – Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 3
misdemeanor."
SECTION 6. Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act become effective July 1, 2026, and apply
to all kratom products possessed, sold, distributed, or manufactured on or after that date, and to
all offenses committed on or after that date. Section 4 of this act is effective when it becomes law
and applies beginning with the 2025-2026 school year. Section 5 of this act becomes effective
December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses committed on or after that date. The remainder of this
act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 468-Third Edition Page 15